Rhode Island statutes. Title 9 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure Generally
Chapter 4 Commencement of Proceedings

9-4-1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 246; G.L. 1909, ch. 283, § 26; G.L. 1923, ch. 333, § 26; G.L. 1938, ch. 509, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-4-1

; Repealed by P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 12, effective January 10, 1966. For rule regulating joinder of claims and remedies in superior court see Super Ct. R. Civ. P. Rule 18. For rule regulating joinder of claims and remedies in district court, see Dist. Ct. R. Civ. P. Rule 18.

9-4-2.
Venue of actions involving realty.

All civil actions which concern realty, or any right, easement, or interest therein, or the possession thereof, all civil actions for breaking and entering the close of any plaintiff, and all actions in which the title to real estate may be tried and determined, shall, if brought in the superior court, be brought in the court for the county, and if brought in the district court, in the division where the land lies; and whenever the land, whether consisting of an entire tract or of two (2) or more separate tracts, lies partly in two (2) or more counties or divisions, such actions, if brought in the superior court, may be brought in the court for any county, or if brought in a district court, in any division where the land or any portion thereof lies.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 221; G.L. 1909, ch. 283, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 333, § 1; P.L. 1933, ch. 2051, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 511, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-4-2

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 11; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 7.

9-4-3.
Venue based on residence of parties.

All other actions and suits, if brought in the superior court, shall be brought in the court for the county, or if brought in the district court, shall be brought in the division in which some one of the plaintiffs or defendants shall dwell, or in the superior court for the county or in the district court for the division in which the defendant or some one of the defendants shall be found; and if no one of the plaintiffs or defendants shall dwell in the state, the action, if brought in the superior court, may be brought in the court for any county, or if in a district court, in any division.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 222; G.L. 1909, ch. 283, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 333, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 511, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

9-4-3

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 7.

9-4-4.
Venue in personal or transitory actions involving corporations.

Personal or transitory actions and suits brought by or against corporations, if brought in the superior court, shall be brought in the court for the county, and if brought in a district court, shall be brought in the division in which the other party or some one of the other parties dwell, or in the court for the county or in the district court for the division in which the defendant or some one of the defendants shall be found, or in which the corporation is located by its charter, or if not located by its charter, in which the annual meetings of the corporation are required to be, or if not required to be, are actually held.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 223; G.L. 1909, ch. 283, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 333, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 511, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

9-4-4

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 7.

9-4-5.
Venue of actions between nonresident parties.

If no one of the plaintiffs or defendants dwell within the state, and a corporation established out of the state be a party, personal or transitory actions or suits by or against it may, if brought in the superior court, be brought in the court for any county, or if in the district court, in any division.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 224; G.L. 1909, ch. 283, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 333, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 511, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

9-4-5

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 7.

9-4-6.
Dismissal for improper venue — Transfer.

Except as otherwise provided herein, all actions and suits brought contrary to the provisions of §

9-4-2

shall be dismissed, and any action contrary to §§

9-4-3

—

9-4-5

, may be dismissed. In lieu of dismissal, any civil action brought in the wrong county, if brought in the superior court, or in the wrong division, if brought in the district court, may, in the discretion of the court, be transferred to a proper county or division.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 225; G.L. 1909, ch. 283, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 333, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 511, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

9-4-6

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 11; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 7.

9-4-7.
Filing of papers and payment of entry fee.

No proceedings, original or appellate, shall be deemed to be entered until the necessary papers are properly filed and the entry fee, if any is required, is paid.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 259; G.L. 1909, ch. 285, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 335, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 513, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

9-4-7

.

9-4-8.
Correction of defective entries.

Except as otherwise provided by law, whenever any civil action (except in a district court) or whenever any appeal shall not be entered according to law, the court to which the action or appeal is returnable may, in case of accident, mistake, unforeseen cause, or excusable neglect, in its discretion, allow the action or appeal to be entered with or without terms; provided, that if the action or appeal is not entered according to law, in the first instance, all attachments and arrests made therein shall be thereby vacated.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 258; G.L. 1909, ch. 285, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 335, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 513, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-4-8

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 11; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 17.

9-4-9.
Lis pendens.

No proceeding in court, hereafter taken, whether by filing bill, petition, declaration, or other complaint, or by rule of court or otherwise, and no final order, decree, or judgment, concerning the title to any real estate, in this state, or to any interest or easement therein, shall affect the title (except as to parties thereto and their heirs and devisees, and those having actual notice thereof) as to any rights acquired before notice of the filing, or entry of the notice shall be recorded in the records of land evidence in the town or city where the real estate is situated; the notice to be copied in a book duly indexed and kept for that purpose. The notice shall briefly state the names of all the parties, the court wherein filed, the date of filing, and the substance of the bill, petition, declaration or other complaint, rule, order, decree, or judgment, and a description of the real estate thereby affected, so as far as may be necessary to warn any person subsequently dealing with the title to the land.

Any person causing such notice to be recorded shall, within seven (7) days of the recording, cause a copy of said notice to be mailed, regular mail, postage prepaid to all parties named in the bill, petition, declaration or other complaint, rule, order, decree, or judgment at their last known address. Failure to comply with this provision shall not invalidate the lis pendens.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 439; G.L. 1909, ch. 294, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 344, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 439, § 1; P.L. 1940, ch. 942, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-4-9

; P.L. 1988, ch. 85, § 1.